Maryland, session 2026, HB1315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Department of the Environment, in consultation with the Department of
Natural Resources, shall conduct a comprehensive study of technologies installed or used
on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles and assess their potential to reduce
microplastic pollution in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries.
(b) The study shall:
(1) identify, describe, and categorize technologies installed or used on
vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles, including:
(i) microplastic collection devices that use the cooling–water return
flow of outboard motors to filter and capture microplastic particles, including devices
marketed for outboard engines;
(ii) filtration systems designed for installation on commercial vessels
or larger vessels that work by drawing in water and removing microplastic particles before
discharge;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1315*

HOUSE BILL 1315
(iii) floating or stationary systems that remove microplastic particles
from surface waters, rivers, or harbors; and
(iv) any emerging or experimental technologies designed for
installation or use on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles;
(2) assess the technical performance of the technologies identified under
item (1) of this subsection, including, to the extent available:
(i) microplastic particle size ranges targeted by the technologies;
(ii) how efficiently each technology collects or removes microplastic
particles under typical operating conditions;
(iii) the volume of water treated or filtered during normal vessel
operation; and
(iv) maintenance requirements, filter service intervals, and
operational considerations for vessel owners;
(3) evaluate the environmental and water quality benefits and drawbacks
of using technologies installed or used on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles
in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries, including:
(i) potential reductions in microplastic concentrations in surface
waters and nearshore habitats;
(ii) the potential for supporting existing efforts to reduce plastic and
microplastic pollution in watersheds, stormwater, and wastewater; and
(iii) any adverse environmental impacts associated with the
installation, operation, or maintenance of the technologies;
(4) analyze the practicality of large–scale or targeted use of technologies
installed or used on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles in the Chesapeake
Bay and its tributaries, including:
(i) integration with recreational and commercial outboard engines,
including charter vessels, marinas, and rental fleets;
(ii) use on workboats, research vessels, and other State–owned or
locally owned vessels; and
(iii) prioritizing use in areas with higher microplastic particle loads,
including urban tidal waters, marinas, and shipping channels;

HOUSE BILL 1315 3
(5) assess the economic and implementation factors for using technologies
installed or used on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles, including:
(i) capital and operating costs for vessel owners and operators;
(ii) incentives, grants, or pilot programs to encourage voluntary
adoption;
(iii) partnerships with manufacturers of outboard motors, boat
builders, or distributors to integrate microplastic filters or collectors as standard or optional
equipment;
(iv) workforce and training needs for the installation and
maintenance of the technologies; and
(v) opportunities to use federal funding or public–private
partnerships for demonstration projects;
(6) review regulations, permitting requirements, and policies impacting
technologies installed or used on vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles,
including:
(i) federal or State requirements related to onboard water
treatment or discharge that impacts the use of the technologies;
(ii) whether there is a need for regulatory clarification or guidance
on the use or disposal of collected microplastic particles; and
(iii) integration of the technologies into Chesapeake Bay restoration,
total maximum daily load, or other water quality improvement programs; and
(7) identify data and research needs for technologies installed or used on
vessels to capture or remove microplastic particles, including:
(i) long–term performance and durability;
(ii) reductions in microplastic loads throughout the Chesapeake Bay;
and
(iii) ecological effects of large–scale microplastic particle removal.
(c) The Department of the Environment shall:
(1) review research, pilot projects, and technology inventories on
microplastic removal in marine and estuarine waters, including those relating to
technologies installed on or used with vessels and corresponding performance data;

HOUSE BILL 1315
(2) assess opportunities for the State to host or participate in pilot or
demonstration projects to test technologies installed or used on vessels to capture or remove
microplastic particles in the Chesapeake Bay;
(3) consult with the Department of Natural Resources and other State
agencies responsible for water quality, boating, fisheries, and Chesapeake Bay restoration;
and
(4) solicit input from stakeholders, including:
(i) manufacturers and distributors of outboard motors and
technologies installed or used on vessels to capture microplastic particles;
(ii) recreational and commercial boat builders and dealers;
(iii) representatives of the charter boat and for–hire fishing
industries operating in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries;
(iv) marina operators and boating trade associations;
(v) environmental and watershed advocacy organizations working to
reduce plastic and microplastic pollution;
(vi) academic and research institutions specializing in microplastics,
estuarine ecology, and marine engineering; and
(vii) local governments and regional entities involved in Chesapeake
Bay restoration.
(d) On or before December 1, 2027, the Department of the Environment shall
submit an interim report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly that includes:
(1) a description of all technologies reviewed and preliminary findings on
performance and potential environmental benefits;
(2) an initial assessment of practicability, costs, and stakeholder input; and
(3) identification of questions and data needs to be addressed in the
remainder of the study.
(e) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department of the Environment shall submit a
final report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly that includes:
(1) the results of the study;

HOUSE BILL 1315 5
(2) an analysis of the effect of technologies installed or used on vessels on
microplastic pollution in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries;
(3) recommendations for policy changes, pilot programs, funding
mechanisms, or incentives to support the use of technologies installed or used on vessels to
capture or remove microplastic particles where appropriate; and
(4) any recommended statutory or regulatory changes necessary to
integrate technologies installed or used on vessels to capture or remove microplastic
particles into State water quality and Chesapeake Bay restoration programs.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.